Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,132
Dwelling units; occupancy eligibility.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Housing Agency Act with respect to mixed-income developments or except as otherwise permitted by law, dwelling units in a local housing agency's developments shall be rented only to households consisting of persons of eligible income at the time of their initial occupancy of such units. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local housing agency may allow police officers, elected officials, and maintenance and management employees not otherwise eligible for residence to reside in dwelling units in the housing agency's developments.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 61.